Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2206
Legislative intent.

It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate seven hundred fifty thousand dollars from the General Fund for each of fiscal years 2015-16 and 2016-17 and one million five hundred thousand dollars from the General Fund for each of fiscal years 2017-18 and 2018-19 to the department which shall pursue federal matching funds as applicable and allocate such funds to contracting providers of family finding services who or which shall use such funds to (1) provide family finding services pursuant to contracts with the department, (2) create and coordinate training initiatives for departmental case managers assigned to cases referred for family finding services to promote provider and family engagement and to train case managers on the principles of family finding services for successful outcomes, and (3) provide contract monitoring and oversight of the pilot project and pay evaluation costs.

Laws 2015, LB243, § 6.